Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2926.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28-5 of the General Laws entitled "Fair Employment Practices" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
28-5-44. Labor and payment of debts by contractors.
Any contract for capital improvements to any healthcare facility as defined in § 23-17-2
including, but not limited to, construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, and alteration,
shall adhere to the requirements and obligations in chapter 13 of title 37 which requires all relevant
contractors and subcontractors performing work on the healthcare facility to pay their employees,
as defined in § 37-13-7.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005724
========